phonology.foma
define S ["-"|":"];
define V [ a | e | i | o | u | ä | ë | ï | ö | ü | ā | ē | ī | ō | ū ];
define X [ "A" | "O" | "V" ];
define C [ {b'} | {ch} | {ch'} | h | j | k | {k'} | l | m | n | p | q | {q'} | r | s
                | t | {t'} | {tz} | {tz'} | w | x | y | 7 ];


define VowelLoss [
            [ %( [V|X] %)  ->   0  || V S* _ ]
        .o. [ %( [V|X] %) (->)  0 ] 
        .o. [ %( -> 0 ] 
        .o. [ %) -> 0 ]
];

define CanonicalVowelLoss [
            [ %( [V|X] %)  ->   0  || V S* _ ]
        .o. [ %( -> 0 ] 
        .o. [ %) -> 0 ]
];
define VowelHarmony [
	[ "A" -> u || u \V* _ 	] .o.
	[ "A" -> o || o \V* _ 	] .o.
	[ "A" -> a 		] .o.
	[ "O" -> u || u \V* _	] .o.
	[ "O" -> o		] .o.
	[ "V" -> u || u \V* _	] .o.
	[ "V" -> o || o \V* _	] .o.
	[ "V" -> a || a \V* _	] .o.
	[ "V" -> e || e \V* _	] .o.
	[ "V" -> i || i \V* _	] .o.
        [ %< V %> -> 0 ]
];

define Aitch [
	[ "h" -> "w" || [o|u] S* _ S* V     ] .o.
	[ "h" -> "y" || V     S* _ S* V     ] 
];

define ConsonantHarmony [
	[ "1" -> {b'} || {b'} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {ch'} || {ch'} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {ch} || {ch} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {j} || {j} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {k'} || {k'} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {k} || {k} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {l} || {l} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {m} || {m} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {n} || {n} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {p} || {p} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {q'} || {q'} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {q} || {q} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {r} || {r} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {s} || {s} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {tz'} || {tz'} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {tz} || {tz} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {t'} || {t'} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {t} || {t} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {w} || {w} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {x} || {x} V C "-" V _ ].o.
	[ "1" -> {y} || {y} V C "-" V _ ].o.
        ~$[1]
];


define VowelLength [
	[	a a -> ā,
		e e -> ē,
		i i -> ī,
		o o -> ō,
		u u -> ū  || _ \V* "#" ] .o.
	[ 	a h -> ā,
		e h -> ē,
		i h -> ī,
		o h -> ō,
		u h -> ū  || _ S* [C|.#.] ] .o. # /h/ gives long vowels unaffected by
					# shortening
	[ a -> ā, e -> ē, i -> ī, o -> ō, u -> ū || _ \V* L ] .o. [L -> 0] .o.
	[ a -> ā, e -> ē, i -> ī, o -> ō, u -> ū || R "-" _ ] .o. [R -> 0] .o.
					# So does morphological vowel length
	[	a 7 -> ä,
		e 7 -> ë,
		i 7 -> ï,
		o 7 -> ö,
		u 7 -> ü  ] .o.
	[ 	a a -> a,
		e e -> e,
		i i -> i,
		o o -> o,
		u u -> u  ]
];


# TODO: This is not quite right.  We need to get straight about when contraction
#	occurs in word-final syllables and when it doesn't.
#	The correct pattern for Misal-style K'iche' *might* be:
#		- Don't contract with a long stressed vowel.
#		- The SSes -oh/-uh, -a’/-o’/-u’ and -a/-o/-u count as long
#
#	NB 	xinwiye'eej does not contract but *xinwiye'ej does
#		q'a'aam doesn't contract
#		wa'iim doesn't contract
#		*ya'om contracts to yo'm	(what does ya'oom do?)
#		ya'ooj doesn't contract, but *ya'oj -> yo'j

define VowelContraction [
	[ [..] <-> "|" || _ V \V* "#" ] .o.      # Separate off the stressed vowel
        [ [V [S|V]* V] @-> %< ... %> ] .o. 	# Capture seqs that could contract.
     	[ a -> ä, e -> ë, i -> ï, o -> ö, u -> ü,
	  ā -> ä, ē -> ë, ī -> ï, ō -> ö, ū -> ü 
			|| _ %> ] .o.            # Insert a glottal if needed
        [ [S|V]* @-> 0 || %< _ V %>] .o.  # Do contraction.
        ~$[%< V \%>* V %>]  .o.                # Filter out seqs that could have
                                                # contracted but didn't.
        [ %< -> 0, %> -> 0 ]                    # Remove brackets.
];

define Spelling [
	[ ā -> a h, ē -> e h, ī -> i h, ō -> o h, ū -> u h || _ "#" ] .o.
	[ ā -> a a, ē -> e e, ī -> i i, ō -> o o, ū -> u u] .o.
	[ ä -> a ', ë -> e ', ï -> i ', ö -> o ', ü -> u '] .o.
	[ "|" -> 0 ] .o.
	[ "#" -> 0 ] .o.
        [ "7" -> ']
];

define Unhyphenate [ "-" -> 0];

load stack lex.bin
define Input;
define Analyze [Input .o. VowelLoss .o. VowelHarmony .o. ConsonantHarmony .o. VowelLength .o. Aitch .o. VowelContraction .o. Spelling .o. Unhyphenate];
regex Analyze;
save stack analyze.bin
pop

define AnalysisLookup Analyze.i;

define Segment [AnalysisLookup .o. Input .o. CanonicalVowelLoss .o. VowelHarmony .o. ConsonantHarmony .o. ["R"->0] .o. ["7"->"'"]].i;

regex Segment;
save stack segment.bin
pop

#define CleanTopSide [0 <- "(" ?* ")" ] .o. [0 <- "|"] .o. [0 <- "|a0|"] .o. [0 <- "|b0|"] .o. [0 <- "#"];

#define Variation [ [ " " -> {*} ] .o.
#		   [ V (->) "*" || C "*"* _ "*"* C ] .o.
#		   [ ’ (->) "*" || V "*"* _   ] .o.
#		   [ V (->) "*" || V "*"* _   ] .o.
#		   [ h (->) "*"   || _ "*"* .#. ] .o.
#		   [ ’ (->) {**b’} || V "*"* _ "*"* V ] .o.
#		   [ V (->) {V**} ] 
#		];

#define Viol ${*};
#define Viol0 ~Viol;
#define Viol1 ~[Viol^2];
#define Viol2 ~[Viol^3];
#define Viol3 ~[Viol^4];
#define Viol4 ~[Viol^5];
#define Viol5 ~[Viol^6];
#define Viol6 ~[Viol^7];
#define Viol7 ~[Viol^8];
#define Viol8 ~[Viol^9];
#define Viol9 ~[Viol^10];
#define Pardon "*" -> 0;

#define Analyze CleanTopSide .o. Words .o. Phonology .o. Unhyphenate .o. Variation;
#regex Analyze;
#save stack analyze.bin
#pop

#define MorphSegment  [" " <-> "@"] .o. Phonology.i .o. ["@" <-> " "] .o. Words.l .o. [[..] -> "#" || _ ".#."] .o. Phonology .o. Unhyphenate;


#define WSGen [Unhyphenate.i .o. MorphSegment .o. Variation];

#define WordSegment [WSGen .o. Viol0 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol1 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol2 .o. Pardon] .p.
#%		   [WSGen .o. Viol3 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol4 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol5 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol6 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol7 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol8 .o. Pardon] .p.
#		   [WSGen .o. Viol9 .o. Pardon];
#
#regex WordSegment;
#save stack wordsegment.bin
#pop
#regex MorphSegment;
#save stack morphsegment.bin
